Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.035

Prosecutions for official delinquencies in the assessment, collection and payment of revenue; failure to pay over or deliver public money or property; and against all debtors of the state.

Upon receipt of information from the state auditor as provided in *RCW 43.09.050(3) as now or hereafter amended, the attorney general shall direct prosecutions in the name of the state for all official delinquencies in relation to the assessment, collection, and payment of the revenue, against all persons who, by any means, become possessed of public money or property, and fail to pay over or deliver the same, and against all debtors of the state.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.09.050 was amended by 1992 c 118 s 6, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4).